Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3306
Procedure authorized.

Any procedure not expressly set forth in sections 19-3301 to 19-3326 but deemed necessary or convenient to carry out any of its purposes is authorized.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 6, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-817;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 6, p. 440.